Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-405
Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund; created; use; investment.

The Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund is created. All fees collected by the Department of Labor pursuant to the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund. Fees so collected shall not lapse into the General Fund. Fees so collected shall be used for the sole purpose of administering the provisions of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act. Any money in the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. All funds existing in the Elevator Inspection Fund and the Nebraska Amusement Ride Fund on January 1, 2008, shall be transferred to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund.

Laws 2007, LB265, § 24.

Conveyance Safety Act, see section 48-2501.

Nebraska Amusement Ride Act, see section 48-1801.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.